Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2095.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 135. Mandate Waiver Program.--(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a board of school directors may adopt a resolution to apply to the Department of Education for a waiver of any provision of this act, the regulations of the State Board of Education or the standards of the Secretary of Education if the waiver will enable the school district to improve its instructional program or operate in a more effective, efficient or economical manner.(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), and 1234567891011121314151617181920 except as otherwise provided in this section, a board of school directors may contact the intermediate unit of which it is a member to propose that the intermediate unit apply to the Department of Education for a waiver of any provision of this act, the regulations of the State Board of Education or the standards of the Secretary of Education on behalf of all of the intermediate unit's member school districts if the waiver will enable the member school districts to improve their instructional programs or operate in a more effective, efficient or economical manner. Upon the receipt of such a proposal the intermediate unit shall circulate a notice to its member school districts outlining a proposed waiver application and requesting a response. The intermediate unit shall submit a waiver application to the Department of Education on behalf of its member school districts upon receiving a copy of a resolution from each of its member school districts signifying approval of the proposed waiver application. An application may not be submitted by an intermediate unit under this subsection unless the boards of school directors of each of its member school districts have adopted a resolution signifying approval of the proposed waiver application and transmitted copies of their resolutions to the intermediate unit.(b) (1) The application for a waiver shall be in a manner and on a form developed by the Department of Education and shall:(i) Specify the need for the waiver. (ii) Provide supporting data and information to explain the benefits to be obtained by the waiver and, when applicable, to explain the instructional program that will operate under the waiver.20250HB2095PN2691 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Include an evaluation procedure to determine the effectiveness of an innovative program or programs; the effectiveness of a revised instructional program, which shall include measures of student performance; and the effectiveness of changes in the operations of the school district.(2) In developing the application process and form provided for in paragraph (1) the Department of Education shall:(i) Create a uniform application form which provides applicants with the ability to apply for waivers to single or multiple provisions of this act, the regulations of the State Board of Education or the standards of the Secretary of Education through a single application.(ii) Create a uniform application form which intermediate units must use when applying for waivers on behalf of their member school districts. (3) The Department of Education may not impose any additional requirements on waiver applicants beyond those provided for in this section and any additional requirements relating to the submission or resubmission of a waiver application.(c) The application for a waiver shall be adopted by a resolution of the board of school directors at a regularly scheduled meeting of the board or, in the case of an application submitted by an intermediate unit on behalf of its member school districts, by the submission of resolutions to the intermediate unit from the board of each intermediate unit member school district signifying approval of the proposed waiver application. Resolutions submitted by school districts to an intermediate unit under this section must be adopted at a regularly scheduled meeting of the board. Prior to implementing the policies or 20250HB2095PN2691 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 procedures contained in the application, approval by the Department of Education shall be required.(d) The Department of Education shall have sixty (60) days from receipt of the application to approve, disapprove or request modifications to the application. If the Department of Education fails to act within that time period, the waiver shall be deemed to be approved.(e) (1) If the Department of Education disapproves the application for waiver, the Department of Education shall transmit notice to the waiver applicant of the basis for the disapproval . The waiver applicant may submit a revised application for a waiver.(2) A waiver applicant may appeal any disapproval of a waiver application to the Secretary of Education in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 (relating to practice and procedure) and 7 (relating to judicial review).(f) Five (5) years from the implementation of the waiver, the waiver applicant shall submit to the Department of Education the evaluation specified in subsection (b)(1)(iii) . When the evaluation of a waiver indicates an improvement in student performance, instructional program or school operations, the waiver shall be renewed by the Department of Education and shall remain in effect, unless a board of school directors opts out of the waiver. In the case of a waiver renewed by the Department of Education for all the member school districts of an intermediate unit, the waiver shall remain in effect for any school district which has not opted out of the waiver.(g) The following provisions of this act shall not be subject to waiver pursuant to this section: sections 108, 110, 111, 321, 322, 323, 324, 325, 326, 327, 431, 436, 437, 440.1, 20250HB2095PN2691 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 443, 510, 513, 518, 527, 688, 691, 696, 701.1, 708, 740, 741, 752, 753, 771, 776, 777, 785, 808, 809, 810, 1073, 1073.1, 1076, 1077, 1080, 1302, 1303, 1310, 1317, 1317.2, 1318, 1327, 1327.1, 1330, 1332, 1361, 1366, 1501, 1502, 1513, 1517, 1518, 1521, 1523, 1546, 1547 and 2104; provisions prohibiting discrimination; Articles VI, VI-A, XI, XI-A, XII, XIII-A, XIV and XVII-A; and this section . (h) The following provisions of 22 Pa. Code (relating to education) shall not be subject to waiver pursuant to this section:Chapter 4 (relating to academic standards and assessment).Chapter 11 (relating to student attendance).Chapter 12 (relating to students and student services).Chapter 14 (relating to special education services and programs).Chapter 15 (relating to protected handicapped students).Chapter 16 (relating to special education for gifted students).Section 32.3 (relating to assurances).Section 121.3 (relating to discrimination prohibited).(i) The board of school directors may not seek a waiver of any Federal law or State law applicable to a public school that is not within the provisions of this act.(j) The Department of Education shall post all waiver requests and Department of Education approvals and disapprovals under this section on its publicly accessible Internet website.(k) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede or preempt any provisions of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.(l) Intermediate unit boards of directors and area career 20250HB2095PN2691 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and technical boards shall be eligible to apply for mandate waivers under this section except for those in subsections (g), (h) and (n).(m) Charter school and cyber charter school boards of trustees shall be eligible to apply for mandate waivers under this section except those in subsections (g) and (h).(n) The following provisions of this act shall not be subject to waiver for intermediate units and area career and technical schools under this section: Articles IX-A and XVIII.(o) The provisions of section 751 shall be subject to waiver, provided that the waiver applicant shall bid all construction-related projects under separate contracts in accordance with the provisions of section 751(a.2). All other provisions of section 751, including base amounts, shall be subject to waiver.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2095PN2691 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516